District of Columbia statutes.
7-755.03

Commission procedure and powers.

(a)

The Commission shall meet at least once a quarter to share findings regarding the prevalence and severity of health disparities that exist in each election ward.

(b)

The Chairperson of the Commission, or his or her designee, who must be a member of the Commission, shall convene all Commission meetings.

(c)

A majority of the voting members appointed to the Commission at any given time shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of official business. Official actions of the Commission shall be taken by a majority vote of the voting members present at the meeting.

(d)

The Commission may use space and supplies owned or rented by the District government and use staff loaned from the Council or detailed by the Mayor for purposes consistent with this chapter as the Commission may determine.

Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 20-192, § 4, 61 DCR 12403